test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-reduced-a_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - luččâ:
    luččâ+N+Sg+Nom: luččâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Gen: luujâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Acc: luujâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Ill: luučân
    luččâ+N+Sg+Loc: luujâst
    luččâ+N+Sg+Com: luujáin
    luččâ+N+Sg+Abe: lujâttáá
    luččâ+N+Ess: luččân
    luččâ+N+Par: luččâd
    luččâ+N+Pl+Nom: luujah
    luččâ+N+Pl+Gen: [luujâi, lujâi]
    luččâ+N+Pl+Acc: luujâid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Ill: luujáid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Loc: luujâin
    luččâ+N+Pl+Com: lujâiguin
    luččâ+N+Pl+Abe: lujâittáá

  Noun - kurkkâ:
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: kurkkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuurkân
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuurkâst
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Com: kurkkáin
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: kurkâttáá
    kurkkâ+N+Ess: kurkkân
    kurkkâ+N+Par: kurkkâd
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuurkah
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuurkâi, kurkâi]
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuurkâid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: kurkkáid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuurkâin
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Com: kurkâiguin
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: kurkâittáá

  Noun - mirkkâ:
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: mirkkâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: miirkân
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: miirhâst
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Com: mirháin
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: mirhâttáá
    mirkkâ+N+Ess: mirkkân
    mirkkâ+N+Par: mirkkâd
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [miirhâi, mirhâi]
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: miirhâid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: mirháid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: miirhâin
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Com: mirhâiguin
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: mirhâittáá

  Noun - merkkâ:
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: merkkâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: meerkân
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: meerhâst
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Com: merháin
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: merhâttáá
    merkkâ+N+Ess: merkkân
    merkkâ+N+Par: merkkâd
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: meerhah
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [meerhâi, merhâi]
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: meerhâid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: merháid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: meerhâin
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Com: merhâiguin
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: merhâittáá


  Noun - lavkkâ:
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: lavkkâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: laavkân
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavhâst
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Com: lavháin
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: lavhâttáá
    lavkkâ+N+Ess: lavkkân
    lavkkâ+N+Par: lavkkâd
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavhah
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavhâi, lavhâi]
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavhâid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavháid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavhâin
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Com: lavhâiguin
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: lavhâittáá

  Noun - korkkâ:
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: korkkâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: koorkân
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: koorhâst
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Com: korháin
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: korhâttáá
    korkkâ+N+Ess: korkkân
    korkkâ+N+Par: korkkâd
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: koorhah
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koorhâi, korhâi]
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: koorhâid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: korháid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: koorhâin
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Com: korhâiguin
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: korhâittáá

  Noun - tulkkâ:
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: tulkkâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuulkân
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuulhâst
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Com: tulháin
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: tulhâttáá
    tulkkâ+N+Ess: tulkkân
    tulkkâ+N+Par: tulkkâd
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuulhâi, tulhâi]
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: tuulhâid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: tulháid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: tuulhâin
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Com: tulhâiguin
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: tulhâittáá

  Noun - kaastâ:
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Nom: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Gen: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Acc: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Ill: kaastân
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Loc: kaastâst
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Com: kastáin
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Abe: kastâttáá
    kaastâ+N+Ess: kaastân
    kaastâ+N+Par: kaastâd
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Acc: [kaastâi, kastâi]
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Acc: kaastâid
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Ill: kastáid
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Loc: kaastâin
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Com: kastâiguin
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Abe: kastâittáá

  Noun - saahâ:
    saahâ+N+Sg+Nom: saahâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Gen: saavâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Acc: saavâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Ill: saahân
    saahâ+N+Sg+Loc: saavâst
    saahâ+N+Sg+Com: savváin
    saahâ+N+Sg+Abe: savâttáá
    saahâ+N+Ess: saahân
    saahâ+N+Par: saahâd
    saahâ+N+Pl+Nom: saavah
    saahâ+N+Pl+Gen: saavâi 
    saahâ+N+Pl+Gen: savâi
    saahâ+N+Pl+Acc: saavâid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Ill: savváid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Loc: saavâin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Com: savâiguin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Abe: savâittáá


  Noun - kurrâ: # 2B
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Nom: kurrâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuurân
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuurâst
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Com: kuuráin
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Abe: kurâttáá
    kurrâ+N+Ess:    kurrân
    kurrâ+N+Par:   kurrâd
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuurah
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Gen: kuurâi
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuurâid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuuráid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuurâin
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Com: kurâiguin
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Abe: kurâittáá
    
  Noun - ruttâ:
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruttâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruuđâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruuđâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruutân
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruuđâst
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Com: ruuđáin
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruđâttáá
    ruttâ+N+Ess:    ruttân
    ruttâ+N+Par:    ruttâd
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruuđah
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Gen: ruuđâi 
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruuđâid
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruuđáid
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruuđâin
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Com: ruđâiguin
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruđâittáá
    
  Noun - šoŋŋâ:
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: šoŋŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: šooŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: šooŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: šooŋán
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: šooŋâst
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: šooŋáin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: šoŋâttáá
    šoŋŋâ+N+Ess:    šoŋŋân
    šoŋŋâ+N+Par:    šoŋŋâd
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: šooŋah
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: šooŋâi 
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: šooŋâid
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: šooŋáid
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: šooŋâin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: šoŋâiguin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: šoŋâittáá
    
  Noun - paarâ:
    paarâ+N+Sg+Nom: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Gen: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Acc: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Ill: paarân
    paarâ+N+Sg+Loc: paarâst
    paarâ+N+Sg+Com: paaráin
    paarâ+N+Sg+Abe: parâttáá
    paarâ+N+Ess:    paarrân
    paarâ+N+Par:    paarrâd
    paarâ+N+Pl+Nom: paarah
    paarâ+N+Pl+Gen: paarâi
    paarâ+N+Pl+Acc: paarâid
    paarâ+N+Pl+Ill: paaráid
    paarâ+N+Pl+Loc: paarâin
    paarâ+N+Pl+Com: parâiguin
    paarâ+N+Pl+Abe: parâittáá
    
     Noun - vuojâ:
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuojân
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuojâst
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Com: vuojáin
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuojâttáá
    vuojâ+N+Ess: vuoijân
    vuojâ+N+Par: vuoijâd
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuojah
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vuojâi,vuojâi]
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuojâid
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuojáid 
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuojâin
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Com: vuojâiguin
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuojâittáá

    Noun - njuolâ:
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuolân
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuolâst
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Com: njuoláin
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuolâttáá
    njuolâ+N+Ess: njuollân
    njuolâ+N+Par: njuollâd
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuolah
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Gen: [njuolâi,njuolâi]
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuolâid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuoláid 
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuolâin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Com: njuolâiguin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuolâittáá
    
    Noun - suonâ:
    suonâ+N+Sg+Nom: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Gen: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Acc: suonâ
    suonâ+N+Sg+Ill: suonân
    suonâ+N+Sg+Loc: suonâst
    suonâ+N+Sg+Com: suonáin
    suonâ+N+Sg+Abe: suonâttáá
    suonâ+N+Ess: suonnân
    suonâ+N+Par: suonnâd
    suonâ+N+Pl+Nom: suonah
    suonâ+N+Pl+Gen: [suonâi,suonâi]
    suonâ+N+Pl+Acc: suonâid
    suonâ+N+Pl+Ill: suonáid 
    suonâ+N+Pl+Loc: suonâin
    suonâ+N+Pl+Com: suonâiguin
    suonâ+N+Pl+Abe: suonâittáá
    
    Noun - muorâ:
    muorâ+N+Sg+Nom: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Gen: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Acc: muorâ
    muorâ+N+Sg+Ill: muorân
    muorâ+N+Sg+Loc: muorâst
    muorâ+N+Sg+Com: muoráin
    muorâ+N+Sg+Abe: muorâttáá
    muorâ+N+Ess: muorrân
    muorâ+N+Par: muorrâd
    muorâ+N+Pl+Nom: muorah
    muorâ+N+Pl+Gen: [muorâi,muorâi]
    muorâ+N+Pl+Acc: muorâid
    muorâ+N+Pl+Ill: muoráid 
    muorâ+N+Pl+Loc: muorâin
    muorâ+N+Pl+Com: muorâiguin
    muorâ+N+Pl+Abe: muorâittáá
    
    Noun - tullâ:
    tullâ+N+Sg+Nom: tullâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuulâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Acc: tuulâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuulân
    tullâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuulâst
    tullâ+N+Sg+Com: tulláin
    tullâ+N+Sg+Abe: tulâttáá
    tullâ+N+Ess: tullân
    tullâ+N+Par: tullâd
    tullâ+N+Pl+Nom: tuulah
    tullâ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuulâi, tulâi]
    tullâ+N+Pl+Acc: tuulâid
    tullâ+N+Pl+Ill: tulláid
    tullâ+N+Pl+Loc: tuulâin
    tullâ+N+Pl+Com: tulâiguin
    tullâ+N+Pl+Abe: tulâittáá
    
    Noun - kunnâ:
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Nom: kunnâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuunâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuunâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuunân
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuunâst
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Com: kunnáin
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Abe: kunâttáá
    kunnâ+N+Ess: kunnân
    kunnâ+N+Par: kunnâd
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuunah
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuunâi, kunâi]
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuunâid
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Ill: kunnáid
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuunâin
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Com: kunâiguin
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Abe: kunâittáá
    
    Noun - korrâ:
    korrâ+N+Sg+Nom: korrâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Gen: koorâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Acc: koorâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Ill: koorân
    korrâ+N+Sg+Loc: koorâst
    korrâ+N+Sg+Com: korráin
    korrâ+N+Sg+Abe: korâttáá
    korrâ+N+Ess: korrân
    korrâ+N+Par: korrâd
    korrâ+N+Pl+Nom: koorah
    korrâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koorâi, korâi]
    korrâ+N+Pl+Acc: koorâid
    korrâ+N+Pl+Ill: korráid
    korrâ+N+Pl+Loc: koorâin
    korrâ+N+Pl+Com: korâiguin
    korrâ+N+Pl+Abe: korâittáá

Noun - čiŋŋâ:
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: čiŋŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: čiiŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: čiiŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: čiiŋân
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: čiiŋâst
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: čiŋŋáin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: čiŋâttáá
    čiŋŋâ+N+Ess: čiŋŋân
    čiŋŋâ+N+Par: čiŋŋâd
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: čiiŋah
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [čiiŋâi, čiŋâi]
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: čiiŋâid
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: čiŋŋáid
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: čiiŋâin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: čiŋâiguin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: čiŋâittáá
    
    Noun - juŋŋâ:
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: juŋŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: juuŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: juuŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: juuŋân
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: juuŋâst
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: juŋŋáin
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: juŋâttáá
    juŋŋâ+N+Ess: juŋŋân
    juŋŋâ+N+Par: juŋŋâd
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: juuŋah
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [juuŋâi, juŋâi]
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: juuŋâid
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: juŋŋáid
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: juuŋâin
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: juŋâiguin
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: juŋâittáá
